Georgia, session 2025_26, HB601.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
37 SECTION 1.
38 This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Georgia Gun Safe Act of 2025."
39 SECTION 2.
40 Article 4 of Chapter 11 of Title 16 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
41 dangerous instrumentalities and practices, is amended in Part 1, relating to general
H. B. 601
- 2 -

25 LC 56 0294
42 provisions, by revising Code Section 16-11-101.1, relating to furnishing pistol or revolver
43 to person under the age of 18 years, as follows:
44 "16-11-101.1.
45 (a) For the purposes of As used in this Code section, the term:
46 (1) 'Handgun' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 16-11-125.1.
47 (2) 'Long gun' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 16-11-125.1.
48 (3) 'Minor' means any person under the age of 18 years.
49 (2) 'Pistol or revolver' means a handgun as defined in Code Section 16-11-125.1.
50 (b) It shall be unlawful for a person to intentionally, knowingly, or recklessly to sell or
51 furnish a pistol or revolver handgun or long gun to a minor, except that it shall be lawful
52 for a parent or legal guardian to permit possession of a pistol or revolver handgun or long
53 gun by a minor for the purposes specified in subsection (c) (d) of Code Section 16-11-132
54 unless otherwise expressly limited by subsection (c) of this Code section.
55 (c)(1) It shall be unlawful for a parent or legal guardian to permit possession of a pistol
56 or revolver handgun or long gun by a minor if the parent or legal guardian knows of a
57 minor's conduct which violates the provisions of Code Section 16-11-132 and fails to
58 make reasonable efforts to prevent any such violation of Code Section 16-11-132.
59 (2) Notwithstanding any provisions of subsection (c) (d) of Code Section 16-11-132 or
60 any other law to the contrary, it shall be unlawful for any parent or legal guardian to
61 intentionally, knowingly, or recklessly to furnish to or permit a minor to possess a pistol
62 or revolver handgun or long gun if such parent or legal guardian is aware of a substantial
63 risk that such minor will use a pistol or revolver to commit a felony offense or if such
64 parent or legal guardian who is aware of such substantial risk fails to make reasonable
65 efforts to prevent commission of the offense by the minor.
66 (3) In addition to any other act which violates this subsection, a parent or legal guardian
67 shall be deemed to have violated this subsection if such parent or legal guardian furnishes
68 to or permits possession of a pistol or revolver handgun or long gun by any minor who
H. B. 601
- 3 -

25 LC 56 0294
69 has been convicted of a forcible felony or forcible misdemeanor, as defined in Code
70 Section 16-1-3, or who has been adjudicated for committing a delinquent act under the
71 provisions of Article 6 of Chapter 11 of Title 15 for an offense which would constitute
72 a forcible felony or forcible misdemeanor, as defined in Code Section 16-1-3, if such
73 minor were an adult.
74 (d) Upon conviction of a violation of subsection (b) or (c) of this Code section, a person
75 shall be guilty of a felony and punished by a fine not to exceed $5,000.00 or by
76 imprisonment for not less than three nor more than five years, or both."
77 SECTION 3.
78 Said article is further amended in said part by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
79 "16-11-114.
80 (a) As used in this Code section, the term '3D printed firearm' means any weapon produced
81 by means of three-dimensional printing from computer-aided design files which is designed
82 or intended to propel a missile of any kind and which is not produced subject to a license
83 from the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives of the United States
84 Department of Justice for the manufacture of firearms.
85 (b) It shall be unlawful to print or to produce a 3D printed firearm in this state.
86 (c) Any person that violates this Code section shall commit the offense of possessing a 3D
87 printed firearm and upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by imprisonment for a
88 period of five years."
89 SECTION 4.
90 Said article is further amended by revising Part 2, relating to possession of dangerous
91 weapons, as follows:
H. B. 601
- 4 -

25 LC 56 0294
92 "Part 2
93 16-11-120.
94 This part shall be known and may be cited as the 'Georgia Firearms and Weapons Act.'
95 16-11-121.
96 As used in this part, the term:
97 (1) '3D printed firearm' means any weapon produced by means of three-dimensional
98 printing from computer-aided design files which is designed or intended to propel a
99 missile of any kind and which is not produced subject to a license from the Bureau of
100 Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives of the United States Department of Justice
101 for the manufacture of firearms.
102 (2) 'Dangerous weapon' means any weapon commonly known as a 'rocket launcher,'
103 'bazooka,' or 'recoilless rifle' rocket launcher, bazooka, or recoilless rifle which fires
104 explosive or nonexplosive rockets designed to injure or kill personnel or destroy heavy
105 armor, or similar weapon used for such purpose. The Such term shall also mean a
106 weapon commonly known as a 'mortar' mortar which fires high explosive from a metallic
107 cylinder and which is commonly used by the armed forces as an antipersonnel weapon
108 or similar weapon used for such purpose. The Such term shall also mean a weapon
109 commonly known as a 'hand grenade' hand grenade or other similar weapon which is
110 designed to explode and injure personnel or similar weapon used for such purpose.
111 (3) 'Large capacity magazine' means any ammunition feeding device with the capacity
112 to accept more than sixteen rounds of ammunition; provided, however, that such term
113 shall not include:
114 (A) A feeding device that has been permanently altered so that it cannot accommodate
115 more than ten rounds; or
116 (B) A tubular magazine that is contained in a lever-action firearm.
H. B. 601
- 5 -

25 LC 56 0294
117 (2)(4) 'Machine gun' means any weapon which shoots or is designed to shoot,
118 automatically, more than six shots, without manual reloading, by a single function of the
119 trigger.
120 (3)(5) 'Person' means any individual, partnership, company, association, or corporation.
121 (4)(6) 'Sawed-off rifle' means a weapon designed or redesigned, made or remade, and
122 intended to be fired from the shoulder; and designed or redesigned, made or remade, to
123 use the energy of the explosive in a fixed metallic cartridge to fire only a single projectile
124 through a rifle bore for each single pull of the trigger; and which has a barrel or barrels
125 of less than 16 inches in length or has an overall length of less than 26 inches.
126 (5)(7) 'Sawed-off shotgun' means a shotgun or any weapon made from a shotgun whether
127 by alteration, modification, or otherwise having one or more barrels less than 18 inches
128 in length or if such weapon as modified has an overall length of less than 26 inches.
129 (6)(8) 'Shotgun' means a weapon designed or redesigned, made or remade, and intended
130 to be fired from the shoulder; and designed or redesigned, and made or remade, to use the
131 energy of the explosive in a fixed shotgun shell to fire through a smooth bore either a
132 number of ball shot or a single projectile for each single pull of the trigger.
133 (7)(9) 'Silencer' means any device for silencing or diminishing the report of any portable
134 weapon such as a rifle, carbine, pistol, revolver, machine gun, shotgun, fowling piece, or
135 other device from which a shot, bullet, or projectile may be discharged by an explosive.
136 16-11-122.
137 No person shall have in his or her possession any 3D printed firearm, sawed-off shotgun,
138 sawed-off rifle, machine gun, large capacity magazine, dangerous weapon, or silencer
139 except as provided in Code Section 16-11-124.
H. B. 601
- 6 -

25 LC 56 0294
140 16-11-123.
141 A person commits the offense of unlawful possession of firearms or weapons when he or
142 she knowingly has in his or her possession any 3D printed firearm, sawed-off shotgun,
143 sawed-off rifle, machine gun, large capacity magazine, dangerous weapon, or silencer, and,
144 upon conviction thereof, he or she shall be punished by imprisonment for a period of five
145 years.
146 16-11-124.
147 This part shall not apply to:
148 (1) A peace officer of any duly authorized police agency of this state or of any political
149 subdivision thereof, or a law enforcement officer of any department or agency of the
150 United States who is regularly employed and paid by the United States, this state, or any
151 such political subdivision, or an employee of the Department of Corrections of this state
152 who is authorized in writing by the commissioner of corrections to transfer or possess
153 such firearms while in the official performance of his or her duties;
154 (2) A member of the National Guard or of the armed forces of the United States,
155 including to wit: the army, navy, marine corps, air force, space force, or coast guard who,
156 while serving therein, possesses such firearm in the line of duty;
157 (3) Any 3D printed firearm, sawed-off shotgun, sawed-off rifle, machine gun, large
158 capacity magazine, dangerous weapon, or silencer which has been modified or changed
159 to the extent that it is inoperative. Examples of the requisite modification include
160 weapons with their barrel or barrels filled with lead, hand grenades filled with sand, or
161 other nonexplosive materials;
162 (4) Possession of a sawed-off shotgun, sawed-off rifle, machine gun, dangerous weapon,
163 or silencer by a person who is authorized to possess the same because he or she has
164 registered the 3D printed firearm, sawed-off shotgun, sawed-off rifle, machine gun, large
H. B. 601
- 7 -

25 LC 56 0294
165 capacity magazine, dangerous weapon, or silencer in accordance with the dictates of the
166 National Firearms Act, 68A Stat. 725 (26 U.S.C. Sections 5841-5862); and
167 (5) A security officer employed by a federally licensed nuclear power facility or a
168 licensee of such facility, including a contract security officer, who is trained and qualified
169 under a security plan approved by the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission or
170 other federal agency authorized to regulate nuclear facility security; provided, however,
171 that this exemption shall apply only while such security officer is acting in connection
172 with his or her official duties on the premises of such nuclear power facility or on
173 properties outside the facility property pursuant to a written agreement entered into with
174 the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction over the facility. The exemption
175 under this paragraph does not include the possession of silencers.
176 16-11-125.
177 In any complaint, accusation, or indictment and in any action or proceeding brought for the
178 enforcement of this part it shall not be necessary to negative any exception, excuse,
179 proviso, or exemption contained in this part, and the burden of proof of any such exception,
180 excuse, proviso, or exemption shall be upon the defendant."
181 SECTION 5.
182 Said article is further amended in Part 3, relating to carrying and possession of firearms, by
183 revising Code Section 16-11-125.1, relating to definitions, as follows:
184 "16-11-125.1.
185 As used in this part, the term:
186 (1) 'Handgun' means a firearm of any description, loaded or unloaded, from which any
187 shot, bullet, or other missile can be discharged by an action of an explosive where the
188 length of the barrel, not including any revolving, detachable, or magazine breech, does
H. B. 601
- 8 -

25 LC 56 0294
189 not exceed 12 inches; provided, however, that the term 'handgun' such term shall not
190 include a gun which discharges a single shot of 0.46 centimeter or less in diameter.
191 (2) 'Knife' means a cutting instrument designed for the purpose of offense and defense
192 consisting of a blade that is greater than 12 inches in length which is fastened to a handle.
193 (2.1) 'Lawful weapons carrier' means any person who is licensed or eligible for a license
194 pursuant to Code Section 16-11-129 and who is not otherwise prohibited by law from
195 possessing a weapon or long gun, any resident of any other state who would otherwise
196 be eligible to obtain a license pursuant to such Code section but for the residency
197 requirement, and any person licensed to carry a weapon in any other state.
198 (3) 'License holder' means a person who holds a valid weapons carry license.
199 (4) 'Long gun' means a firearm with a barrel length of at least 18 inches and overall
200 length of at least 26 inches designed or made and intended to be fired from the shoulder
201 and designed or made to use the energy of the explosive in a fixed:
202 (A) Shotgun shell to fire through a smooth bore either a number of ball shot or a single
203 projectile for each single pull of the trigger or from which any shot, bullet, or other
204 missile can be discharged; or
205 (B) Metallic cartridge to fire only a single projectile through a rifle bore for each single
206 pull of the trigger;
207 provided, however, that the term 'long gun' such term shall not include a gun which
208 discharges a single shot of 0.46 centimeter or less in diameter.
209 (5) 'Weapon' means a knife or handgun.
210 (6) 'Weapons carry license' or 'license' means a license issued pursuant to Code Section
211 16-11-129."
212 SECTION 6.
213 Said article is further amended in said part by revising Code Section 16-11-126, relating to
214 having or carrying handguns, long guns, or other weapons, exceptions for homes, motor
H. B. 601
- 9 -

25 LC 56 0294
215 vehicles, private property, and other locations and conditions and unlawful carrying of a
216 weapon, as follows:
217 "16-11-126.
218 (a) Any person who is not prohibited by law from possessing a handgun or long gun may
219 have or carry on his or her person a weapon or long gun on his or her property or inside his
220 or her home, motor vehicle, or place of business.
221 (b) Any person who is not prohibited by law from possessing a handgun or long gun may
222 have or carry on his or her person a long gun.
223 (c) Any person who is not prohibited by law from possessing a handgun or long gun may
224 have or carry any handgun, provided that it is enclosed in a case and unloaded.
225 (d) Any person who is not prohibited by law from possessing a handgun or long gun who
226 is eligible for a weapons carry license a lawful weapons carrier may transport a handgun
227 or long gun in any private passenger motor vehicle; provided, however, that private
228 property owners or persons in legal control of private property through a lease, rental
229 agreement, licensing agreement, contract, or any other agreement to control access to such
230 private property shall have the right to exclude or eject a person who is in possession of a
231 weapon or long gun on their private property in accordance with paragraph (3) of
232 subsection (b) of Code Section 16-7-21, except as provided in Code Section 16-11-135.
233 (d)(e)(1) Any person licensed to carry a weapon in any other state shall be authorized to
234 carry a weapon in this state while the licensee is not a resident of this state; provided,
235 however, that:
236 (A) Such licensee person licensed to carry a weapon in any other state shall carry the
237 weapon in compliance with the laws of this state; and
238 (B) No other state shall be required to recognize and give effect to a license issued
239 pursuant to this part that is held by a person who is younger than 21 years of age.
H. B. 601
- 10 -

25 LC 56 0294
240 (2)(A) The Attorney General shall create and maintain on the Department of Law's
241 website a list of states whose laws recognize and give effect to a license issued pursuant
242 to this part.
243 (B) The Attorney General shall enter into an agreement with any state that requires an
244 agreement to recognize and give effect to a license issued pursuant to this part.
245 (C) Any person who is not a weapons carry license holder in this state and who is
246 licensed to carry a weapon in any other state whose laws recognize and give effect to
247 a license issued pursuant to this part shall be authorized to carry a weapon in this state
248 for 90 days after he or she becomes a resident of this state; provided, however, that such
249 person shall carry the weapon in compliance with the laws of this state, shall as soon
250 as practicable submit a weapons carry license application as provided for under Code
251 Section 16-11-129, and shall remain licensed in such other state for the duration of time
252 that he or she is a resident of this state but not a weapons carry license holder in this
253 state.
254 (e)(f)(1) Any person with a valid hunting or fishing license on his or her person, or any
255 person not required by law to have a hunting or fishing license, who is engaged in legal
256 hunting, fishing, or sport shooting when the person has the permission of the owner of
257 the land on which the activities are being conducted may have or carry on his or her
258 person a weapon or long gun while hunting, fishing, or engaging in sport shooting.
259 (2) Any person with a valid hunting or fishing license on his or her person, or any person
260 not required by law to have a hunting or fishing license, who is otherwise engaged in
261 legal hunting, fishing, or sport shooting on recreational or wildlife management areas
262 owned by this state may have or carry on his or her person a knife while engaging in such
263 hunting, fishing, or sport shooting.
264 (f)(g) Notwithstanding Code Sections 12-3-10, 27-3-1.1, 27-3-6, and 16-12-122 through
265 16-12-127, any lawful weapons carrier may carry a weapon in all parks, historic sites, or
266 recreational areas, as such term is defined in Code Section 12-3-10, including all publicly
H. B. 601
- 11 -

25 LC 56 0294
267 owned buildings located in such parks, historic sites, and recreational areas, in wildlife
268 management areas, and on public transportation; provided, however, that a person shall not
269 carry a handgun into a place where it is prohibited by federal law.
270 (g)(h)(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (a) through (f) (g) of this Code
271 section, no person shall carry a weapon unless he or she is a lawful weapons carrier.
272 (2) A person commits the offense of unlawful carrying of a weapon when he or she
273 violates the provisions of paragraph (1) of this subsection.
274 (h)(i) Upon conviction of the offense of unlawful carrying of a weapon, a person shall be
275 punished as follows:
276 (1) For the first offense, he or she shall be guilty of a misdemeanor; and
277 (2) For the second offense within five years, as measured from the dates of previous
278 arrests for which convictions were obtained to the date of the current arrest for which a
279 conviction is obtained, and for any subsequent offense, he or she shall be guilty of a
280 felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be imprisoned for not less than two years and
281 not more than five years.
282 (i)(j) Nothing in this Code section shall in any way operate or be construed to affect, repeal,
283 or limit the exemptions provided for under Code Section 16-11-130."
284 SECTION 7.
285 Said article is further amended in said part in Code Section 16-11-127.1, relating to carrying
286 weapons within school safety zones, at school functions, or on a bus or other transportation
287 furnished by a school, by revising subsection (a), by reserving paragraph (6) of subsection
288 (c), and by revising paragraph (20) of subsection (c) as follows:
289 "(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
290 (1) 'Bus or other transportation furnished by a school' means a bus or other transportation
291 furnished by a public or private elementary or secondary school.
H. B. 601
- 12 -

25 LC 56 0294
292 (2) 'School function' means a school function or related activity that occurs outside of a
293 school safety zone and is for a public or private elementary or secondary school.
294 (3) 'School safety zone' means in or on within 500 yards of any real property or building
295 owned by or leased to:
296 (A) Any public or private elementary school, secondary school, or local board of
297 education and used for elementary or secondary education; and
298 (B) Any public or private technical school, vocational school, college, university, or
299 other institution of postsecondary education.
300 (4) 'Weapon' means and includes any pistol, revolver, or any weapon designed or
301 intended to propel a missile of any kind, or any dirk, bowie knife, switchblade knife,
302 ballistic knife, any other knife having a blade of two or more inches, straight-edge razor,
303 razor blade, spring stick, knuckles, whether made from metal, thermoplastic, wood, or
304 other similar material, blackjack, any bat, club, or other bludgeon-type weapon, or any
305 flailing instrument consisting of two or more rigid parts connected in such a manner as
306 to allow them to swing freely, which may be known as a nun chahka, nun chuck,
307 nunchaku, shuriken, or fighting chain, or any disc, of whatever configuration, having at
308 least two points or pointed blades which is designed to be thrown or propelled and which
309 may be known as a throwing star or oriental dart, or any weapon of like kind, and any
310 stun gun or taser as defined in subsection (a) of Code Section 16-11-106. This paragraph
311 excludes any of these instruments used for classroom work authorized by the teacher."
312 "(20)(A) Any lawful weapons carrier when he or she is in any building or on real
313 property owned by or leased to any public technical school, vocational school, college,
314 or university, or other public institution of postsecondary education; provided, however,
315 that such exception shall:
316 (i) Not apply to buildings or property used for athletic sporting events or student
317 housing, including, but not limited to, fraternity and sorority houses;
H. B. 601
- 13 -

25 LC 56 0294
318 (ii) Not apply to any preschool or childcare space located within such buildings or
319 real property;
320 (iii) Not apply to any room or space being used for classes related to a college and
321 career academy or other specialized school as provided for under Code Section
322 20-4-37;
323 (iv) Not apply to any room or space being used for classes in which high school
324 students are enrolled through a dual enrollment program, including, but not limited
325 to, classes related to the 'Dual Enrollment Act' as provided for under Code Section
326 20-2-161.3;
327 (v) Not apply to faculty, staff, or administrative offices or rooms where disciplinary
328 proceedings are conducted; and
329 (vi) Only apply to the carrying of handguns which a person is licensed to carry
330 pursuant to subsection (e) of Code Section 16-11-126 and pursuant to Code Section
331 16-11-129; and
332 (vi)(vii) Only apply to the carrying of handguns which are concealed.
333 (B) Any lawful weapons carrier who carries a handgun in a manner or in a building,
334 property, room, or space in violation of this paragraph shall be guilty of a misdemeanor;
335 provided, however, that, for a conviction of a first offense, such lawful weapons carrier
336 shall be punished by a fine of $25.00 and not be sentenced to serve any term of
337 confinement.
338 (C) As used in this paragraph, the term:
339 (i) 'Concealed' means carried in such a fashion that does not actively solicit the
340 attention of others and is not prominently, openly, and intentionally displayed except
341 for purposes of defense of self or others. Such term shall include, but not be limited
342 to, carrying on one's person while such handgun is substantially, but not necessarily
343 completely, covered by an article of clothing which is worn by such person, carrying
344 within a bag of a nondescript nature which is being carried about by such person, or
H. B. 601
- 14 -

25 LC 56 0294
345 carrying in any other fashion as to not be clearly discernible by the passive
346 observation of others.
347 (ii) 'Preschool or childcare space' means any room or continuous collection of rooms
348 or any enclosed outdoor facilities which are separated from other spaces by an
349 electronic mechanism or human-staffed point of controlled access and designated for
350 the provision of preschool or childcare services, including, but not limited to,
351 preschool or childcare services licensed or regulated under Article 1 of Chapter 1A
352 of Title 20."
353 SECTION 8.
354 Said article is further amended in said part in Code Section 16-11-129, relating to weapons
355 carry license, gun safety information, temporary renewal permit, mandamus, and verification
356 of license, by revising subsection (a) and subparagraph (b)(2)(H) as follows:
357 "(a) Application for weapons carry license or renewal license; term.
358 (1) The judge of the probate court of each county shall, on application under oath, on
359 payment of a fee of $30.00 $20.00, and on investigation of the applicant pursuant to
360 subsections (b) and (d) of this Code section, issue a weapons carry license or renewal
361 license valid for a period of five years one year to any person whose domicile is in that
362 county or who is on active duty with the United States armed forces and who is not a
363 domiciliary of this state but who either resides in that county or on a military reservation
364 located in whole or in part in that county at the time of such application. Such license or
365 renewal license shall authorize that person to carry any weapon in any county of this state
366 notwithstanding any change in that person's county of residence or state of domicile.
367 (2)(A) As used in this paragraph subsection, the term 'service member' means an active
368 duty member of the regular or reserve component of the United States Army, United
369 States Navy, United States Marine Corps, United States Coast Guard, United States Air
H. B. 601
- 15 -

25 LC 56 0294
370 Force, United States Space Force, United States National Guard, Georgia Army
371 National Guard, or Georgia Air National Guard.
372 (B) Any service member whose weapons carry license or renewal license expired while
373 such service member was serving on active duty outside this state shall be authorized
374 to carry any weapon in accordance with such expired license for a period of six months
375 from the date of his or her discharge from active duty or reassignment to a location
376 within this state. When carrying a weapon pursuant to Code Section 16-11-137, the
377 service member shall also have in his or her immediate possession a copy of the official
378 military orders or a written verification signed by such service member's commanding
379 officer which shall evidence that such service member is authorized to carry any
380 weapon in accordance with such expired license for a period of six months from the
381 date of his or her discharge from active duty or reassignment to a location within this
382 state.
383 (3)(A)(B) Applicants shall submit the application for a weapons carry license or
384 renewal license to the judge of the probate court on forms prescribed and furnished free
385 of charge to persons wishing to apply for the license or renewal license.
386 (C)(B)(i) An application shall be considered to be for a renewal license if the
387 applicant has a weapons carry license or renewal license with 90 or fewer days
388 remaining before the expiration of such weapons carry license or renewal license or
389 30 or fewer days since the expiration of such weapons carry license or renewal license
390 regardless of the county of issuance of the applicant's expired or expiring weapons
391 carry license or renewal license.
392 (ii) An application of any service member whose weapons carry license or renewal
393 license expired while such service member was serving on active duty outside this
394 state shall be considered to be for a renewal license if such service member applies
395 within six months from the date of his or her discharge from active duty or
396 reassignment to a location within this state as provided for in a copy of such service
H. B. 601
- 16 -

25 LC 56 0294
397 member's official military orders or a written verification signed by such service
398 member's commanding officer as provided by the service member.
399 (iii) An applicant who is not a United States citizen shall provide sufficient personal
400 identifying data, including without limitation, his or her place of birth and United
401 States issued alien or admission number, as the Georgia Bureau of Investigation may
402 prescribe by rule or regulation. An applicant who is in nonimmigrant status shall
403 provide proof of his or her qualifications for an exception to the federal firearm
404 prohibition pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 922(y). Forms shall be designed to elicit
405 information from the applicant pertinent to his or her eligibility under this Code
406 section, including citizenship, but shall not require data which is nonpertinent or
407 irrelevant, such as serial numbers or other identification capable of being used as a de
408 facto registration of firearms owned by the applicant. The Department of Public
409 Safety shall furnish application forms and license forms required by this Code section.
410 The forms shall be furnished to each judge of each probate court within this state at
411 no cost."
412 "(H) Any person who has been convicted of any of the following:
413 (i) Carrying a weapon without a weapons carry license in violation of Code
414 Section 16-11-126; or
415 (ii) Carrying carrying a weapon or long gun in an unauthorized location in violation
416 of Code Section 16-11-127 and has not been free of all restraint or supervision in
417 connection therewith and free of any other conviction for at least five years
418 immediately preceding the date of the application;"
419 SECTION 9.
420 Said article is further amended in said part by repealing in its entirety Code Section
421 16-11-130.1, relating to allowing personnel to carry weapons within certain school safety
422 zones and at school functions, and designating said Code section as reserved.
H. B. 601
- 17 -

25 LC 56 0294
423 SECTION 10.
424 Said article is further amended in said part by revising Code Section 16-11-132, relating to
425 possession of handgun by person under the age of 18 years, as follows:
426 "16-11-132.
427 (a) For the purposes of this Code section, a handgun or long gun is considered loaded if
428 there is a cartridge in the chamber or cylinder of the handgun.
429 (b) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this part and except as otherwise provided in
430 this Code section, it shall be unlawful for any person under the age of 18 16 years to
431 possess or have under such person's control a handgun or long gun. A person convicted
432 of a first violation of this subsection shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished
433 by a fine not to exceed $1,000.00 or by imprisonment confinement for not more than 12
434 months, or both. A person convicted of a second or subsequent violation of this subsection
435 shall be guilty of a felony and shall be punished by a fine of $5,000.00 or by imprisonment
436 for a period of three years, or both.
437 (c) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this part and except as otherwise provided in
438 this Code section, it shall be unlawful for any person under the age of 18 years to possess
439 or have under such person's control a handgun or long gun. A person convicted of a first
440 violation of this subsection shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a
441 fine not to exceed $1,000.00 or by confinement for not more than 12 months, or both. A
442 person convicted of a second or subsequent violation of this subsection shall be guilty of
443 a felony and shall be punished by a fine of $5,000.00 or by imprisonment for a period of
444 three years, or both.
445 (c)(d) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) (e) of this Code section, the
446 provisions of subsection (b) (c) of this Code section shall not apply to:
447 (1) Any person under the age of 18 years who is:
448 (A) Attending a hunter education course or a firearms safety course;
H. B. 601
- 18 -

25 LC 56 0294
449 (B) Engaging in practice in the use of a firearm or target shooting at an established
450 range authorized by the governing body of the jurisdiction where such range is located;
451 (C) Engaging in an organized competition involving the use of a firearm or
452 participating in or practicing for a performance by an organized group under 26 U.S.C.
453 Section 501(c)(3) which uses firearms as a part of such performance;
454 (D) Hunting or fishing pursuant to a valid license if such person has in his or her
455 possession such a valid hunting or fishing license if required; is engaged in legal
456 hunting or fishing; has permission of the owner of the land on which the activities are
457 being conducted; and the handgun or long gun, whenever loaded, is carried only in an
458 open and fully exposed manner; or
459 (E) Traveling to or from any activity described in subparagraphs (A) through (D) of
460 this paragraph if the handgun or long gun in such person's possession is not loaded;
461 (2) Any person under the age of 18 years who is on real property under the control of
462 such person's parent, legal guardian, or grandparent and who has the permission of such
463 person's parent or legal guardian to possess a handgun or long gun; or
464 (3) Any person under the age of 18 years who is at such person's residence and who, with
465 the permission of such person's parent or legal guardian, possesses a handgun or long gun
466 for the purpose of exercising the rights authorized in Code Section 16-3-21 or 16-3-23.
467 (d)(e) Subsection (c) (d) of this Code section shall not apply to any person under the age
468 of 18 years who has been convicted of a forcible felony or forcible misdemeanor, as
469 defined in Code Section 16-1-3, or who has been adjudicated for committing a delinquent
470 act under the provisions of Article 6 of Chapter 11 of Title 15 for an offense which would
471 constitute a forcible felony or forcible misdemeanor, as defined in Code Section 16-1-3,
472 if such person were an adult."
H. B. 601
- 19 -

25 LC 56 0294
473 SECTION 11.
474 Said article is further amended in said part by revising Code Section 16-11-137, relating to
475 detention for investigation of license to carry prohibited, as follows:
476 "16-11-137.
477 (a) Each weapons carry license holder shall have his or her valid weapons carry license in
478 his or her immediate possession at all times when carrying a weapon, or if such person is
479 exempt from having a weapons carry license pursuant to Code Section 16-11-130 or
480 subsection (c) of Code Section 16-11-127.1, he or she shall have proof of his or her
481 exemption in his or her immediate possession at all times when carrying a weapon, and his
482 or her failure to do so shall be prima-facie evidence of a violation of the applicable
483 provision of Code Sections 16-11-126 through 16-11-127.2.
484 (b) A person carrying a weapon shall not be subject to detention for the sole purpose of
485 investigating whether such person has a weapons carry license, whether such person is
486 exempt from having a weapons carry license pursuant to Code Section 16-11-130 or
487 subsection (c) of Code Section 16-11-127.1, or whether such person is a lawful weapons
488 carrier as defined in Code Section 16-11-125.1.
489 (c) A person convicted of a violation of this Code section shall be fined not more than
490 $10.00 if he or she produces in court his or her weapons carry license, provided that such
491 license was valid at the time of his or her arrest, or produces proof of his or her exemption."
492 SECTION 12.
493 Said article is further amended in said part by adding new Code sections to read as follows:
494 "16-11-139.
495 (a) There is established the Georgia Firearms Registry, to be maintained by the Secretary
496 of State. The Georgia Firearms Registry shall collect for each entry:
497 (1) The name of the owner or owners of the firearm;
H. B. 601
- 20 -

25 LC 56 0294
498 (2) The name of the individual or entity from which the firearm was purchased or
499 received;
500 (3) The identification number of the firearm; and
501 (4) The date of purchase or transfer.
502 (b)(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, any firearm purchased
503 through private sale, purchased through a retailer, gifted, inherited, or otherwise acquired
504 by a resident of this state after July 1, 2025, shall be registered by the purchaser or
505 recipient with the Georgia Firearms Registry within 30 days of such purchase or receipt.
506 (2) Any firearm purchased through private sale, purchased through a retailer, gifted,
507 inherited, or otherwise acquired by a resident of this state outside of this state after July 1,
508 2025, shall be registered by the purchaser or recipient with the Georgia Firearms Registry
509 within 30 days of such person's return to the state.
510 (c) A person convicted of a first violation of subsection (b) of this Code section shall be
511 guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine not to exceed $1,000.00 or by
512 confinement for not more than 12 months, or both. A person convicted of a second or
513 subsequent violation of subsection (b) of this Code section shall be guilty of a felony and
514 shall be punished by a fine of $5,000.00 or by imprisonment for a period of three years, or
515 both.
516 16-11-140.
517 (a) A person shall not store a firearm in a motor vehicle unless the firearm is:
518 (1) Unloaded and in a case expressly made to contain such firearm, and the case fully
519 encloses the firearm by being zipped, snapped, buckled, tied, or otherwise fastened, and
520 without any portion of the firearm exposed; or
521 (2) Unloaded and in the closed trunk of a motor vehicle.
H. B. 601
- 21 -

25 LC 56 0294
522 (b) Subsection (a) of this Code section shall not apply to the following persons when
523 acting in the performance of their official duties or when en route to or from their official
524 duties:
525 (1) A peace officer as defined by Code Section 35-8-2;
526 (2) A law enforcement officer of the United States government;
527 (3) A prosecuting attorney of this state or of the United States;
528 (4) An employee of the Department of Corrections or a correctional facility operated by
529 a political subdivision of this state or the United States who is authorized to carry a
530 firearm by the head of such department or correctional agency or facility;
531 (5) An employee of the Department of Community Supervision who is authorized by the
532 commissioner of community supervision to carry a firearm;
533 (6) A person employed as a campus police officer or school security officer who is
534 authorized to carry a weapon in accordance with Chapter 8 of Title 20; or
535 (7) Medical examiners, coroners, and their investigators who are employed by the state
536 or any political subdivision thereof.
537 (c) When the licensed owner of a firearm is not on the premises where such firearm is
538 stored or when such owner knows, or should reasonably know, that a child is likely to gain
539 access to such firearm unless reasonable action is taken to secure the firearm against access
540 by the child, any such firearm shall be secured or stored by using one of the following
541 methods appropriate to each firearm:
542 (1) Secure the firearm with a hardened steel rod or cable at least one-eighth of an inch
543 in diameter through the trigger guard of such firearm. The steel rod or cable shall be
544 secured with a hardened steel lock that has a shackle. The lock and shackle shall be
545 protected or shielded from the use of a bolt cutter, and the rod or cable shall be anchored
546 in a manner that prevents the removal of such firearm from the premises; or
547 (2) Store the firearm in a locked fireproof safe or vault.
H. B. 601
- 22 -

25 LC 56 0294
548 (d) When a firearm is required to be stored pursuant to this Code section, no ammunition
549 for such firearm shall be stored in the same lock box, safe, or other container."
550 SECTION 13.
551 Said article is further amended in Part 5, relating to Brady Law regulations, by revising Code
552 Section 16-11-171, relating to definitions, as follows:
553 "16-11-171.
554 As used in this part, the term:
555 (1) 'Center' means the Georgia Crime Information Center within the Georgia Bureau of
556 Investigation.
557 (2) 'Dealer' means any person licensed as a dealer pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 921, et
558 seq.
559 (3) 'Firearm' means any weapon that is designed to or may readily be converted to expel
560 a projectile by the action of an explosive or the frame or receiver of any such weapon,
561 any firearm muffler or firearm silencer, or any destructive device as defined in 18 U.S.C.
562 Section 921(a)(3).
563 (4) 'Gun show' means any event, function, or marketplace at which 25 or more firearms
564 are offered or exhibited for sale, transfer, or exchange.
565 (5) 'Gun show vendor' means any person that offers for sale, exhibits, sells, transfers, or
566 exchanges one or more firearms at a gun show.
567 (6) 'Involuntarily hospitalized' means hospitalized as an inpatient in any mental health
568 facility pursuant to Code Section 37-3-81 or hospitalized as an inpatient in any mental
569 health facility as a result of being adjudicated mentally incompetent to stand trial or being
570 adjudicated not guilty by reason of insanity at the time of the crime pursuant to Part 2 of
571 Article 6 of Chapter 7 of Title 17.
572 (5)(7) 'NICS' means the National Instant Criminal Background Check System created
573 by the federal 'Brady Handgun Violence Prevention Act' (P. L. No. 103-159)."
H. B. 601
- 23 -

25 LC 56 0294
574 SECTION 14.
575 Said article is further amended in said part by revising subsection (a) of Code Section
576 16-11-172, relating to transfers or purchases of firearms subject to the NICS, information
577 concerning persons who have been involuntarily hospitalized to be forwarded to the FBI,
578 penalties for breach of confidentiality, and exceptions, as follows:
579 "(a) All transfers or purchases of firearms conducted by a licensed importer, licensed
580 manufacturer, gun show vendor, or licensed dealer shall be subject to the NICS. To the
581 extent possible, the center shall provide to the NICS all necessary criminal history
582 information and wanted person records in order to complete an NICS check. A gun show
583 vendor may contract with a licensed dealer for purposes of facilitating transfers, purchases,
584 or NICS checks."
585 SECTION 15.
586 Said article is further amended in said part by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
587 "16-11-172.1.
588 (a) No purchase or transfer of a firearm shall be conducted by a licensed importer, licensed
589 manufacturer, licensed dealer, or gun show vendor to any individual under 21 years of age.
590 (b) All purchases or transfers of firearms to individuals under 27 years of age and
591 conducted by a licensed importer, licensed manufacturer, licensed dealer, or gun show
592 vendor shall not be completed until the fifth day after the initiation of such purchase or
593 transfer; provided, however, that the calculation of the five days shall not include
594 Saturdays, Sundays, or state or federal holidays; and provided, further, that the NICS check
595 provided for under Code Section 16-11-172 may be conducted within the five days.
596 (c) Licensed importers, licensed manufacturers, licensed dealers, and gun show vendors
597 shall, during normal business hours, make records available for inspection by any law
598 enforcement agency for purposes of any criminal investigation.
H. B. 601
- 24 -

25 LC 56 0294
599 (d) Any licensed importer, licensed manufacturer, licensed dealer, or gun show vendor that
600 violates this Code section, or any purchaser or transferee who uses fraud or false
601 representation to circumvent the requirements of subsection (a) of this Code section, shall
602 be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment for not less
603 than one nor more than five years."
604 SECTION 16.
605 Said article is further amended in said part by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
606 "16-11-174.
607 (a) As used in this Code section, the term 'assault weapon' means:
608 (1) A semiautomatic rifle that has an overall length of less than 30 inches;
609 (2) A conversion kit, part, or combination of parts, from which an assault weapon can
610 be assembled or from which a firearm can be converted into an assault weapon if such
611 parts are in the possession or under the control of the same person;
612 (3) A semiautomatic, center fire rifle that has the capacity to accept a detachable
613 magazine and has one or more of the following:
614 (A) A grip that is independent or detached from the stock that protrudes conspicuously
615 beneath the action of the weapon. The addition of a fin attaching the grip to the stock
616 does not exempt the grip if it otherwise resembles the grip found on a pistol;
617 (B) Thumbhole stock;
618 (C) Folding or telescoping stock;
619 (D) Forward pistol, vertical, angled, or other grip designed for use by the nonfiring
620 hand to improve control;
621 (E) Flash suppressor, flash guard, flash eliminator, flash hider, sound suppressor,
622 silencer, or any item designed to reduce the visual or audio signature of the firearm;
623 (F) Muzzle brake, recoil compensator, or any item designed to be affixed to the barrel
624 to reduce recoil or muzzle rise;
H. B. 601
- 25 -

25 LC 56 0294
625 (G) Threaded barrel designed to attach a flash suppressor, sound suppressor, muzzle
626 break, or similar item;
627 (H) Grenade launcher or flare launcher; or
628 (I) A shroud that encircles either all or part of the barrel designed to shield the bearer's
629 hand from heat, except a solid forearm of a stock that covers only the bottom of the
630 barrel;
631 (4) A semiautomatic, center fire rifle that has a fixed magazine with the capacity to
632 accept more than ten rounds;
633 (5) A semiautomatic pistol that has the capacity to accept a detachable magazine and has
634 one or more of the following:
635 (A) A threaded barrel, capable of accepting a flash suppressor, forward handgrip, or
636 silencer;
637 (B) A second hand grip;
638 (C) A shroud that encircles either all or part of the barrel designed to shield the bearer's
639 hand from heat, except a solid forearm of a stock that covers only the bottom of the
640 barrel; or
641 (D) The capacity to accept a detachable magazine at some location outside of the pistol
642 grip; or
643 (6) A semiautomatic shotgun that has any of the following:
644 (A) A folding or telescoping stock;
645 (B) A grip that is independent or detached from the stock that protrudes conspicuously
646 beneath the action of the weapon. The addition of a fin attaching the grip to the stock
647 does not exempt the grip if it otherwise resembles the grip found on a pistol;
648 (C) A thumbhole stock;
649 (D) A forward pistol, vertical, angled, or other grip designed for use by the nonfiring
650 hand to improve control;
651 (E) A fixed magazine in excess of seven rounds; or
H. B. 601
- 26 -

25 LC 56 0294
652 (F) A revolving cylinder shotgun.
653 (b) No purchase or transfer of any assault weapon shall be conducted by a licensed
654 importer, licensed manufacturer, licensed dealer, or gun show vendor in this state for the
655 period beginning July 1, 2025, through January 1, 2036.
656 (c) Any licensed importer, licensed manufacturer, licensed dealer, or gun show vendor that
657 violates this Code section, or any purchaser or transferee who uses fraud or false
658 representation to circumvent the requirements of subsection (b) of this Code section, shall
659 be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment for not less
660 than one nor more than five years."
661 SECTION 17.
662 Chapter 8 of Title 35 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to the employment
663 and training of peace officers, is amended by revising Code Section 35-8-8, relating to the
664 requirements for appointment or certification of persons as peace officers and
665 preemployment attendance at a basic training course, and "employment related information"
666 defined, as follows:
667 "35-8-8.
668 (a) Any person employed or certified as a peace officer shall:
669 (1) Be at least 18 years of age;
670 (2) Be a citizen of the United States;
671 (3) Have a high school diploma or its recognized equivalent;
672 (4) Not have been convicted by any state or by the federal government of any crime the
673 punishment for which could have been imprisonment in the federal or state prison or
674 institution nor have been convicted of sufficient misdemeanors to establish a pattern of
675 disregard for the law, provided that, for the purposes of this paragraph, violations of
676 traffic laws and other offenses involving the operation of motor vehicles when the
677 applicant has received a pardon shall not be considered;
H. B. 601
- 27 -

25 LC 56 0294
678 (5) Be fingerprinted for the purpose of conducting a fingerprint based search at the
679 Georgia Bureau of Investigation and the Federal Bureau of Investigation to determine the
680 existence of any criminal record;
681 (6) Possess good moral character as determined by investigation under procedure
682 established by the council and fully cooperate during the course of such investigation;
683 (7) Be found, after examination by a licensed physician or surgeon, to be free from any
684 physical, emotional, or mental conditions which might adversely affect his or her exercise
685 of the powers or duties of a peace officer; and
686 (8) Successfully complete a job related academy entrance examination provided for and
687 administered by the council in conformity with state and federal law. Such examination
688 shall be administered prior to entrance to the basic course provided for in Code Sections
689 35-8-9 and 35-8-11. The council may change or modify such examination and shall
690 establish the criteria for determining satisfactory performance on such examination. The
691 provisions of this paragraph establish only the minimum requirements of academy
692 entrance examinations for peace officer candidates in this state; each law enforcement
693 unit is encouraged to provide such additional requirements and any preemployment
694 examination as it deems necessary and appropriate. Any person with a degree from a
695 postsecondary institution accredited by a regional accrediting agency recognized by the
696 United States Department of Education shall be deemed to have met the requirements of
697 this paragraph.
698 (b) Any person authorized to attend the basic training course prior to employment as a
699 peace officer shall meet the requirements of subsection (a) of this Code section.
700 (c)(1) For purposes of As used in this subsection, the term 'employment related
701 information' means written information contained in a prior employer's records or
702 personnel files that relates to an applicant's, candidate's, or peace officer's performance
703 or behavior while employed by such prior employer, including performance evaluations,
704 records of disciplinary actions, and eligibility for rehire. Such term shall not include
H. B. 601
- 28 -

25 LC 56 0294
705 information prohibited from disclosure by federal law or any document not in the
706 possession of the employer at the time a request for such information is received.
707 (2) Where an investigation is conducted for the purpose of hiring, certifying, or
708 continuing the certification of a peace officer, an employer shall disclose employment
709 related information to the investigating law enforcement agency upon receiving a written
710 request from such agency. Disclosure shall only be required under this subsection if the
711 law enforcement agency's request is accompanied by a copy of a signed, notarized
712 statement from the applicant, candidate, or peace officer releasing and holding harmless
713 such employer from any and all liability for disclosing complete and accurate information
714 to the law enforcement agency.
715 (3) An employer may charge a reasonable fee to cover actual costs incurred in copying
716 and furnishing documents to a requesting law enforcement agency, including retrieving
717 and redacting costs, provided that such amount shall not exceed $25.00 or 25¢ per page,
718 whichever is greater. No employer shall be required to prepare or create any document
719 not already in the employer's possession at the time a request for employment related
720 information is received. Any employment related information provided pursuant to this
721 subsection that is not subject to public disclosure while in the possession of a prior
722 employer shall continue to be privileged and protected from public disclosure as a record
723 of the requesting law enforcement agency.
724 (4) No employer or law enforcement agency shall be subject to any civil liability for any
725 cause of action by virtue of disclosing complete and accurate information to a law
726 enforcement agency in good faith and without malice pursuant to this subsection. In any
727 such cause of action, malice or bad faith shall only be demonstrated by clear and
728 convincing evidence. Nothing contained in this subsection shall be construed so as to
729 affect or limit rights or remedies provided by federal law.
730 (5) Before taking final action on an application for employment based, in whole or in
731 part, on any unfavorable employment related information received from a previous
H. B. 601
- 29 -

25 LC 56 0294
732 employer, a law enforcement agency shall inform the applicant, candidate, or peace
733 officer that it has received such employment related information and that the applicant,
734 candidate, or peace officer may inspect and respond in writing to such information. Upon
735 the applicant's, candidate's, or peace officer's request, the law enforcement agency shall
736 allow him or her to inspect the employment related information and to submit a written
737 response to such information. The request for inspection shall be made within five
738 business days from the date that the applicant, candidate, or peace officer is notified of
739 the law enforcement agency's receipt of such employment related information. The
740 inspection shall occur not later than ten business days after said notification. Any
741 response to the employment related information shall be made by the applicant,
742 candidate, or peace officer not later than three business days after his or her inspection.
743 (6) No person shall be certified, or allowed to continue in his or her certification, or hired
744 as a peace officer if an investigation undertaken pursuant to this subsection determines
745 that such individual has ever been terminated from a position as a peace officer based on
746 misconduct related to such position.
747 (7) Nothing contained in this Code section shall be construed so as to require any person
748 to provide self-incriminating information or otherwise to compel any person to act in
749 violation of his or her right guaranteed by the Fifth Amendment of the United States
750 Constitution and Article I, Section I, Paragraph XVI of the Georgia Constitution. It shall
751 not be a violation of this Code section for a person to fail to provide requested
752 information based on a claim that such information is self-incriminating, provided that
753 notice of such claim is served in lieu of the requested information. An action against
754 such person to require disclosure on the grounds that the claim of self-incrimination is not
755 substantiated may be brought in the superior court of the county of such party's residence
756 or where such information is located."
H. B. 601
- 30 -

25 LC 56 0294
757 SECTION 18.
758 Article 2 of Chapter 3 of Title 38 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
759 organization and administration relative to emergency management, is amended in Code
760 Section 38-3-37, relating to prohibited actions by government official or employee during
761 declared state of emergency, by inserting "or" at the end of paragraph (2), replacing "; or"
762 at the end of paragraph (3) with a period, and by repealing paragraph (4) of subsection (b).
763 SECTION 19.
764 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 601
- 31 -